{"Farsightedness": {"description": "Farsightedness is greater difficulty seeing near objects than distant objects.", "Possible Complications": "Farsightedness can be a risk factor for glaucoma and\u00a0crossed eyes.", "Symptoms": ["Aching eyes", "Blurred vision\u00a0when looking at\u00a0close objects", "Crossed eyes (strabismus) in some children", "Eye strain", "Headache while reading "], "Exams and Tests": "A general eye examination to diagnose farsightedness may include the following tests:Eye movement testing, Glaucoma testing, Refraction test, Retinal examination, Slit-lamp examination, Visual acuity. This list is not all-inclusive. ", "Treatment": "Farsightedness is easily corrected with glasses or contact lenses.\u00a0Surgery is\u00a0available for correcting farsightedness in adults, and can be used for those who do not wish to wear glasses or contacts.", "Causes": "Farsightedness is the result of the visual image being focused behind the retina rather than directly on it. It may be caused by the eyeball being too small or the focusing power being too weak.Farsightedness is often present from birth, but children have a very flexible eye lens, which helps make up for the problem.\u00a0As aging occurs, glasses or contact lenses may be required to correct the vision. If you have family members who are farsighted, you are also more likely to become farsighted. Watch this video about:Seeing"}, "Fanconi syndrome": {"Symptoms": ["Passing large amounts of urine, which can lead to dehydration", "Bone pain", "Weakness"], "Exams and Tests": "Laboratory tests may show that too much of the following substances may be lost in the urine:Amino acids, Bicarbonate, Glucose, Magnesium, Phosphate, Potassium, Sodium, Uric acid. Loss of these substances can lead to a variety of problems. Further tests and a physical exam may show signs of:Dehydration due to excess urination, Growth failure, Osteomalacia, Rickets, Type 2 renal tubular acidosis. ", "description": "Fanconi syndrome is a disorder of the kidney tubes in which certain substances normally absorbed into the bloodstream by the kidneys are released into the urine instead.", "Causes": "Fanconi syndrome can be caused by faulty genes, or it may result later in life due to kidney damage. Sometimes the cause of Fanconi syndrome is unknown.Common causes of Fanconi syndrome in children are genetic defects that affect the body's ability to break down certain compounds such as:Cystine (cystinosis), Fructose (fructose intolerance), Galactose (galactosemia), Glycogen (glycogen storage disease). Cystinosis is the most common cause of Fanconi syndrome in children.Other causes in children include:Exposure to heavy metals such as lead, mercury, or cadmium, Lowe's disease, a rare genetic disorder of the eyes, brain, and kidneys, Wilson's disease. In adults, Fanconi syndrome can be caused by various things that damage the kidneys, including:Certain medications, including azathioprine, cidofovir, gentamicin, and tetracycline, Kidney transplant, Light chain deposition disease, Multiple myeloma, Primary amyloidosis. ", "Treatment": "Many different diseases can cause Fanconi syndrome. The underlying cause and its symptoms should be treated as appropriate."}, "Food allergy": {"description": "A food allergy is an exaggerated immune response triggered by eggs, peanuts, milk, or some other specific food.", "Possible Complications": "Anaphylaxis is a severe, whole-body allergic reaction that is life threatening. Although people with oral allergy syndrome rarely have an anaphylactic reaction, they should ask their doctor whether they need to carry injectable epinephrine.Food allergies can trigger or worsen asthma, eczema, or other disorders.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Diarrhea", "\r\n  Difficulty swallowing\r\n  ", "Itching of the mouth, throat, eyes, skin, or any other\u00a0area", "Light-headedness or fainting", "Nasal congestion", "Nausea", "Runny nose", "Swelling (angioedema), especially of the eyelids, face, lips, and tongue", "Shortness of breath", "Stomach cramps", "Vomiting", "Itchy lips, tongue, and throat", "Swollen lips (sometimes)"], "Exams and Tests": "In severe reactions, you may have low blood pressure and blocked airways.Blood or skin tests are sometimes used to confirm that you have an allergy.\u00a0A\u00a0double-blind food challenge is one way to diagnose true food allergies. During this test, you and your health care provider\u00a0will not know what you are eating.\u00a0\u00a0With elimination diets, you avoid the suspected food until your symptoms disappear. Then you start eating the foods again to see if you develop an allergic reaction.In provocation (challenge) testing, you eat a small amount of the suspected food under medical supervision. This type of test may\u00a0cause severe allergic reactions. Challenge testing should only be done by a health care provider.Never try to cause a reaction or reintroduce a food on your own. These tests should only be done under the guidance of a health care provider -- especially if your first reaction was severe.", "Treatment": "The only proven treatment for a food allergy is to avoid the food. Other treatments, including allergy shots and probiotics, have not been proven to help with food allergies.If your child has a problem with cow\u2019s milk formula, your health care provider may suggest trying a soy-based formula or something called an elemental formula, if it is available.If you suspect that you or your child has a food allergy, see an allergy specialist.If you have symptoms on only one area of the body (for example, a hive on the chin after eating the food), you may not need any treatment. The symptoms will likely go away in a brief time. Antihistamines may relieve the discomfort. Soothing skin creams\u00a0can\u00a0also\u00a0provide some relief.Talk to\u00a0your\u00a0health care provider\u00a0if you think you have had an allergic reaction to food, even if it is only a local reaction.Anyone who has been diagnosed with a food allergy should carry (and know how to use) injectable epinephrine at all times. If you develop any type of serious or whole-body reaction (even hives) after eating the food: Inject the epinephrine., Then go to the nearest hospital or emergency facility right away, preferably by ambulance. . ", "Causes": "Many people have what is called a food intolerance. This term refers to heartburn, cramps, belly pain, or diarrhea that\u00a0can occur after\u00a0they eat\u00a0foods such as:Corn products, Cow's milk and dairy products (See: Lactose intolerance), Wheat and other grains that contain gluten (See: Celiac disease). A true food allergy is much less common.Normally, your body's immune system defends against\u00a0possibly harmful substances, such as bacteria, viruses, and toxins. , In some people, this immune response is triggered by a\u00a0certain food., When this occurs, the immune system releases substances that cause the symptoms of food allergies.. Any food can cause an allergic reaction, but a few foods are the main culprits. The most common food allergies are to:Eggs (mostly in children), Fish (older children and adults), Milk (mostly in children), Peanuts (people of all ages), Shellfish such as shrimp, crab, and\u00a0lobster (people of all ages), Soy (mostly in children), Tree nuts (people of all ages), Wheat (mostly in children). Food additives -- such as dyes, thickeners, and preservatives\u00a0-- may rarely cause a food allergy or intolerance reaction.Some people have an allergy syndrome that affects the mouth and tongue after they eat\u00a0certain fresh fruits and vegetables. Melons, apples,\u00a0pineapple, and other\u00a0foods contain substances that are similar to certain pollens. , The reaction most often occurs when you eat the raw form of the foods. How severe the reaction is depends on how much of the food you eat.. ", "Prevention": "Breastfeeding may help prevent allergies. Otherwise, there is no known way to prevent food allergies except to delay introducing allergy-causing foods to infants until their gastrointestinal tract has had a chance to mature. The timing for this varies from food to food and from baby to baby.Once an allergy has developed, carefully avoiding the offending food usually prevents further problems."}, "Factor VII deficiency": {"description": "Factor VII deficiency is an inherited disorder. A lack of plasma protein factor VII leads to abnormal bleeding.", "Possible Complications": "Excessive bleeding (hemorrhage), Stroke or other nervous system problems from central nervous system bleeding, Joint problems in severe cases when bleeding happens often. ", "Symptoms": ["Bleeding from mucus membranes", "Bleeding into joints", "Bleeding into muscles", "Excessive bruising", "Excessive menstrual bleeding", "Nosebleeds (epistaxis)"], "Exams and Tests": "Partial thromboplastin time (PTT), Plasma factor VII activity, Prothrombin time (PT), Mixing study. Knowing that you have a bleeding disorder helps the doctor can take extra care if you need surgery. It also lets you alert also tell other family members who may have the same problem.", "Treatment": "You can control \u00a0bleeding episodes by receiving normal plasma, concentrates of factor VII, or genetically produced (recombinant) factor VII through a vein (intravenous). You will need frequent treatment during bleeding episodes because factor VII does not last for long inside the body. A form of factor VII called NovoSeven can also be used.For a lack of vitamin K, you can take doses of this vitamin by mouth, through injections under the skin, or through a vein (intravenously).", "Causes": "When you bleed, a series of reactions take place in the body that helps healthy blood clots form. This is called the coagulation cascade. The process involves special proteins called coagulation or clotting factors. You may have a higher chance of excess bleeding if one or more of these factors is missing. Factor VII deficiency occurs when the body does not have enough of a blood clotting protein called factor VII. Most often the lack of factor VII is caused by:Low vitamin K due to long-term use of antibiotics, bile duct obstruction, or poor absorption of vitamin K from the intestines. Some babies are born with vitamin K deficiency., Severe liver disease, Use of drugs that prevent clotting (anticoagulants such as warfarin or Coumadin). It is very rare to be born with factor VII deficiency cause by the body's inability to make working factor VII.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling may be helpful for disorders that start at birth. Taking vitamin K can help if you have a lack of this vitamin. "}, "Fishhook removal": {"Symptoms": ["Pain \r\n", "Localized swelling", "Bleeding"], "Causes": "Fishing accident. ", "description": "This article discusses how to remove a fishhook that is stuck in the skin.", "Prevention": "Keep a safe distance between you and another person who is fishing (in particular, casting)., Keep electrician's pliers with a wire-cutting blade and disinfecting solution in your fishing tackle box., Make sure you are up to date on your tetanus immunization (vaccine). You should receive a booster shot every 10 years.. "}, "Febrile seizures": {"description": "A febrile seizure is a convulsion in a child triggered by a fever.", "Symptoms": ["Sudden tightening (contraction) of muscles on both sides of a child's body. The muscle tightening may last for several seconds or longer.", "The child may cry or moan.", "If standing, the child will fall.", "The child may vomit or bite their tongue.", "Sometimes, children do not breathe and may begin to turn blue.", "The child's body may then begin to jerk rhythmically. The child will not respond to the parent's voice.", "Urine may be passed."], "Exams and Tests": "With a typical febrile seizure, the examination usually is normal, other than symptoms of the illness causing the fever. Often, the child will not need a full seizure workup, which includes an EEG, head CT, and lumbar puncture (spinal tap).Further testing may be needed if the child:Is younger than 9 months or older than 5 years., Has a brain, nerve, or developmental disorder., Had the seizure in only one part of the body., Had the seizure last longer than 15 minutes., Had more than one febrile seizure in 24 hours., Has abnormal findings when examined.. ", "Causes": "A febrile seizure can be very frightening for any parent or caregiver. Most of the time, a febrile seizure does not cause any harm and the child usually does not have a more serious long-term health problem.Febrile seizures occur most often in otherwise healthy children between ages 9 months and 5 years. Toddlers are most commonly affected. Febrile seizures often run in families.Most febrile seizures occur in the first 24 hours of an illness, and may not occur when the fever is highest. Ear infections, a cold or viral illness may trigger a febrile seizure.", "Prevention": "Because febrile seizures can be the first sign of illness, it is often not possible to prevent them. A febrile seizure does not mean that your child is not getting the proper care.Occasionally, a health care provider will prescribe diazepam to prevent or treat febrile seizures that occur more than once. However, no medication is completely effective in preventing febrile seizures.", "Treatment": "During the seizure, take the following measures to keep the child safe:Do not restrain the child or try to stop the seizure movements., Lay the child on the ground in a safe area. Clear the area of furniture or other sharp objects., Slide a blanket under the child if the floor is hard., Move the child only\u00a0if they are in a dangerous location., Loosen tight clothing, especially around the neck. If possible, open or remove clothes from the waist up., If the child vomits or if saliva and mucus build up in the mouth, turn the child to the side or on the stomach. This is also important if it looks like the tongue is getting in the way of breathing., Do not force anything into the child's mouth to prevent biting the tongue. This increases the risk of injury. . Focus your attention on bringing the fever down:Insert an acetaminophen suppository (if you have some) into the child's rectum., Do not give anything by mouth., Apply cool washcloths to the forehead and neck. Sponge the rest of the body with lukewarm (not cold) water. Cold water or alcohol can make the fever worse., After the seizure is over and your child is awake, give the normal dose of ibuprofen or acetaminophen.. After the seizure, the most important step is to identify the cause of the fever.Meningitis can cause a few cases of febrile seizures. It should always be considered, especially in children younger than 1 year old, or in children who still look ill when the fever comes down."}, "Fungal nail infection": {"description": "Fungal nail infection is a fungus growing in and around your fingernail or toenail.", "Symptoms": ["Brittleness", "Change in nail shape", "Crumbling of the outside edges of the nail", "Debris trapped under the nail", "Loosening or lifting up of the nail", "Loss of luster and shine on the nail surface", "Thickening of the nail", "White or yellow streaks on the side of the nail "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will look at your nails to find out if you have a fungal infection. The diagnosis can be confirmed by looking at scrapings from the nail under a microscope. This can help determine the type of fungus. Samples can also be sent to a lab for a culture. (Results may take up to 3 weeks.)", "Causes": "Fungi can live on the dead tissues of the hair, nails, and outer skin layers.Common fungal infections include:Athlete's foot, Jock itch, Ringworm on the skin of the body or head. Fungal nail infections often start after a fungal infection on the feet. They occur more often in toenails than in fingernails. And they are most often seen in adults as they age.You are at higher risk of getting a fungal nail infection if you:Have minor skin or nail injuries, Have a deformed nail or nail disease, Have moist skin for a long time, Have immune system problems, Wear footwear that does not allow air to reach your feet. ", "Prevention": "Good general health and hygiene help prevent fungal infections.Do not share tools used for manicures and pedicures., Keep your skin clean and dry., Take proper care of your nails., Wash and dry your hands thoroughly after touching any kind of fungal infection.. ", "Treatment": "Over-the-counter creams and ointments usually do not help treat this condition.Prescription antifungal medicines that you take by mouth may help clear the fungus.You will need to take the medicine for about 2 to 3 months for toenails; a shorter time for fingernails., Your health care provider will do lab tests to check for liver damage while you are taking these medicines. . Laser treatments may get rid of the fungus in the nails.In some cases, you may need to have the nail removed."}, "Foreign body in the nose": {"Symptoms": ["Difficulty breathing through the affected nostril", "Feeling of something in the nose", "Foul-smelling or bloody nasal discharge", "Irritability, particularly in infants", "Irritation or pain in the nose "], "description": "This article discusses first aid for a foreign object placed into the nose.", "Prevention": "Teach children to avoid placing foreign objects into their noses and other body openings. Keep small objects out of the reach of infants and toddlers. "}, "Fuchs' dystrophy": {"description": "Fuchs' (pronounced \"fooks\") dystrophy is an eye disease in which cells lining the inner surface of the cornea slowly start to die off. The disease usually affects both eyes.", "Symptoms": ["Eye pain", "Eye sensitivity to light\u00a0and glare", "Foggy or blurred vision, at first only in the mornings", "Seeing colored halos around lights", "Worsening vision throughout the day"], "Exams and Tests": "A doctor can diagnose Fuchs' dystrophy during a slit-lamp examination.Other\u00a0tests that may be done include:Pachymetry -- measures the thickness of the cornea, Specular microscope examination -- allows the doctor to look at the thin layer of cells that line the back part of the cornea, Visual acuity test. ", "Causes": "Fuchs' dystrophy can be inherited, which means it can be passed down from parents to children. If either of your parents has the disease, you have a 50% chance of developing the condition.However, the condition may also occur in persons without a known family history of the disease.Fuchs' dystrophy is more common in women than in men. Vision problems usually do not appear before age 50, although doctors may be able to see signs of the disease in affected persons by their 30s\u00a0or 40s.Fuchs' dystrophy affects the thin layer of cells that line the back part of the cornea. These cells help pump excess fluid out of the cornea. As more and more cells are lost, fluid begins to build up in the cornea, causing swelling and a cloudy cornea.At first, fluid may build up only during sleep, when the eye is closed. As the disease gets worse, small blisters may form. The blisters get bigger and may eventually break, causing eye pain. Fuchs' dystrophy can also cause the shape of the cornea to change, leading to more vision problems.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention. Avoiding cataract surgery or taking special precautions during cataract surgery may delay the need for a corneal transplant.", "Treatment": "Eye drops or ointments that draw fluid out of the cornea are used to relieve symptoms of Fuchs' dystrophy.If painful sores develop on the cornea, soft contact lenses or surgery to create flaps over the sores may help reduce pain.The only cure for Fuchs' dystrophy is a corneal transplant. Until recently, the most common type of corneal transplant was penetrating keratoplasty. During this procedure, a small round piece of the cornea is removed, leaving an opening in the front of the eye. A matching piece of cornea from a human donor is then sewn into the opening in the front of the eye.A newer technique called endothelial keratoplasty (DSEK, DSAEK, or DMEK) has become the preferred option for patients with Fuchs' dystrophy. In this procedure, only the inner layers of the cornea are replaced, instead of all the layers. This leads to a faster recovery and fewer complications. Stitches are usually not needed."}, "Fetal alcohol syndrome": {"description": "Fetal alcohol syndrome is growth, mental, and physical problems that may occur in a baby when a mother drinks alcohol during pregnancy.", "Symptoms": ["Poor growth while the baby is in the womb and after birth", "Decreased muscle tone and poor coordination", "Delayed development and problems in three or more major areas: thinking, speech, movement, or social skills", "Heart defects such as ventricular septal defect (VSD) or atrial septal defect (ASD)", "Problems with the face, including narrow and\u00a0small eyes with large epicanthal folds, small head, small upper jaw, smooth groove in upper lip, and smooth and thin upper lip "], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam of the baby may show a heart murmur or other heart problems. As the baby grows, there may be signs of delayed mental development. There also may be problems with the face and bones.Tests include:Blood alcohol level in pregnant women who show signs of being drunk (intoxicated), Brain imaging studies (CT or MRI) after the child is born , Pregnancy ultrasound. ", "Causes": "Using alcohol during pregnancy can cause the same risks as using alcohol in general. But it poses extra risks to the unborn baby. When a pregnant woman drinks alcohol, it easily passes across the placenta to the fetus. Because of this, drinking alcohol can harm the baby's development.There is no \"safe\" level of alcohol use during pregnancy. Larger amounts of alcohol appear to increase the problems. Binge drinking is more harmful than drinking small amounts of alcohol.Timing of alcohol use during pregnancy is also important. Drinking alcohol is likely most harmful during the first 3 months of pregnancy. But drinking alcohol any time during pregnancy can be harmful.", "Prevention": "Avoiding alcohol during pregnancy prevents fetal alcohol syndrome. Counseling can help women who have already had a child with fetal alcohol syndrome.Sexually active women who drink heavily should use birth control and control their drinking behaviors, or stop using alcohol before trying to get pregnant. \r\n\u00a0 \r\n", "Treatment": "Women who are pregnant or who are trying to get pregnant should not drink any amount of alcohol. Pregnant women with alcohol use disorder\u00a0should join a rehabilitation program and be checked closely by a health care provider throughout pregnancy."}, "Fuel oil poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Loss of vision", "Pain in the throat", "Pain or burning in the nose, eyes, ears, lips, or tongue", "Abdominal pain", "Blood in the stool", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Vomiting, may contain blood", "Collapse", "Low blood pressure that develops rapidly", "Breathing difficulty (from breathing in substance)", "Throat swelling (which may also cause breathing difficulty)", "Convulsions", "Depression", "Difficulty concentrating", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Feeling of being drunk (euphoria)", "Headaches", "Light-headedness", "Loss of alertness (unconsciousness)", "Seizures", "Staggering", "Weakness", "Blisters", "Burn", "Irritation", "Peeling of the skin"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Fecal impaction": {"description": "A fecal impaction is a large lump of dry, hard stool that stays stuck in the rectum. It is most often seen in people who are constipated for a long time. ", "Possible Complications": "Tear (ulceration) of the rectal tissue, Tissue death (necrosis) or rectal tissue injury. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal cramping and bloating", "Leakage of liquid or sudden episodes of watery diarrhea in someone who has chronic constipation", "Rectal bleeding", "Small, semi-formed stools", "Straining when trying to pass stools", "Bladder pressure or loss of bladder control", "Lower back pain", "Rapid heartbeat or light-headedness from straining to pass stool"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will examine your stomach area and rectum. The rectal exam will reveal a hard mass of stool in the rectum.If there has been a recent change in your bowel habits, your doctor may recommend a colonoscopy to check for colon or rectal cancer.", "Treatment": "Treating a fecal impaction involves steps to remove the impacted stool. After that, measures are taken to prevent future fecal impactions.Often a warm mineral oil enema is used to soften and lubricate the stool. However, enemas alone are usually not enough to remove a large, hardened impaction.The mass may have to be broken up by hand. This is called manual removal:A health care provider will need to insert one or two fingers into the rectum and slowly break up the mass into smaller pieces so that it can come out., This process must be done in small steps to avoid causing injury to the rectum., Suppositories inserted into the rectum may be given between attempts to help clear the stool.. Surgery is rarely needed to treat a fecal impaction. An overly widened colon (megacolon) or complete blockage of the bowel may require emergency removal of the impaction.Most people who have had a fecal impaction will need a bowel retraining program. Your doctor and a specially trained nurse or therapist will:Take a detailed history of your diet, bowel patterns, laxative use, medications, and medical problems, Examine you carefully., Recommend changes in your diet, how to use laxatives and stool softeners, special exercises, lifestyle changes, and other special techniques to retrain your bowel., Follow you closely to make sure the program works for you.. ", "Causes": "Constipation is when you are not passing stool as often or as easily as is normal for you. Your stool becomes hard and dry, and it is difficult to pass.Fecal impaction often occurs in people who have had constipation for a long time and have been using laxatives. The problem is even more likely when the laxatives are stopped suddenly. The muscles of the intestines forget how to move stool or feces on their own.You are at more risk for chronic constipation and fecal impaction if:You not move around much and spend most of your time in a chair or bed., You have a disease of the brain or nervous system that damages the nerves that go to the muscles of the intestines.. Certain drugs slow the passage of stool through the bowels:Anticholinergics, which affect the interaction between nerves and muscles of the bowel, Medicines used to treat diarrhea, if they are taken too often, Narcotic pain medicine, such as methadone and codeine. "}, "Femoral nerve dysfunction": {"description": "See also: Peripheral neuropathy; Mononeuropathy; Mononeuritis multiplex", "Possible Complications": "When there is a loss of feeling (sensation), a potential complication is repeated and unnoticed injury to the leg. When there is muscle weakness, falls and related injuries may occur.", "Symptoms": ["Sensation changes in the thigh, knee, or leg, such as decreased sensation, numbness, tingling, burning, or pain", "Weakness of the knee or leg, including difficulty going up and down stairs -- especially down, with a feeling of the knee \"giving way\" or buckling"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will obtain a history from you and examine you. This will include an exam of the nerves and muscles in your legs. The exam may show: You might have weakness when you straighten the knee or bend at the hip, Sensation changes located on the front of the thigh or in the foreleg, You may have an abnormal knee reflex, The quadriceps muscles on the front of the thigh may be smaller than normal . Tests that may be done include:Electromyography (EMG), Nerve conduction tests (NCV), usually done at the same time as an EMG, MRI to check for masses or tumors . Your doctor may order additional tests, depending on your medical history and symptoms. Tests may include blood tests, x-rays, and other imaging tests. ", "Treatment": "Your doctor will try to identify and treat the cause of the nerve damage. Your doctor will treat any medical problems (such as diabetes or bleeding in the pelvis) thought to be causing the nerve damage. In some cases, the nerve will heal with treatment of the underlying medical problem. Other treatments include:Some people might benefit from surgical removal of tumors or other growths that press on the nerve., Pain medication, if necessary. Various other medications can reduce the stabbing pains that some people experience. The benefits of medications should be weighed against any possible side effects., Weight loss and change in lifestyle may be suggested if it is thought that diabetes or excess weight are contributing to the nerve damage.. In some cases, no treatment is required and you'll recover on your own. In that case, any treatment, such as physical therapy, is aimed at increasing mobility, maintaining muscle strength and independence while you recover. Orthopedic appliances such as braces or splints may help in walking. Your health care provider might recommend vocational counseling, occupational therapy, job changes or retraining, or similar interventions.", "Causes": "The femoral nerve is located in the leg. It helps the muscles move the hip and straighten the leg. It provides feeling (sensation) to the front of the thigh and part of the lower leg.A nerve is made up of many fibers, called axons, surrounded by insulation, called the myelin sheath.Damage to a nerve, such as the femoral nerve, is called mononeuropathy. Mononeuropathy usually means there is a local cause of damage to a single nerve. Disorders that involve the entire body (systemic disorders) can also cause isolated nerve damage (such as occurs with mononeuritis multiplex).More common causes of femoral nerve dysfunction are:Direct injury (trauma), Prolonged pressure on the nerve, Compression or entrapment of the nerve by nearby parts of the body or disease-related structures (such as a tumor or abnormal blood vessel) . Prolonged pressure on the nerve decreases blood flow in the area. This can lead to further complications.The femoral nerve can be also be damaged if you have: A broken pelvis bone, A catheter placed into the femoral artery in the groin, Diabetes, which can cause widespread nerve damage, Internal bleeding in the pelvis or belly area (abdomen) . One common risk factor is lying on the back with the thighs and legs flexed and turned (\"lithotomy\" position) during surgery or diagnostic procedures. Branches of the femoral nerve can be compressed by tight or heavy waist belts. People who lose or gain a lot of weight may be at greater risk of femoral nerve injury. Also, people who have more widespread nerve damage from medical or hereditary causes may be more prone to injury to the femoral nerve with any pressure. In some cases, no cause can be found. ", "Prevention": "Prevention depends on the cause of the nerve damage."}, "Fibromyalgia": {"description": "People with fibromalgia may also have tenderness in the joints, muscles, tendons, and other soft tissues.", "Symptoms": ["Painful areas are called tender points. Tender points are found in the soft tissue on the back of the neck, shoulders, chest, lower back, hips, shins, elbows, and knees. The pain then spreads out from these areas.", "The pain may feel like a deep ache, or a shooting, burning pain.", "The joints are not affected, although the pain may feel like it is coming from the joints. ", "Irritable bowel syndrome (IBS)", "Memory and concentration problems", "Numbness and tingling in hands and feet", "Reduced ability to exercise", "Tension or migraine headaches "], "Exams and Tests": "To be diagnosed with fibromyalgia, you must have had at least 3 months of widespread pain with one or more of the following:Ongoing problems with sleep, Fatigue, Thinking or memory problems. It is no longer necessary to find tender points during the exam to make a diagnosis.Results from blood and urine tests are normal most of the time. However, these tests may be done to rule out other conditions with similar symptoms.", "Causes": "The cause is unknown. Possible causes or triggers of fibromyalgia include:Physical or emotional trauma, Abnormal pain response (Areas in the brain that control pain may react differently in people with fibromyalgia.), Sleep disturbances, Infection, such as a virus, although none has been identified . Fibromyalgia is most common among women age 20 to 50.The following conditions may be seen with fibromyalgia or have similar symptoms:Chronic neck or back pain, Chronic fatigue syndrome, Depression, Hypothyroidism (underactive thyroid), Lyme disease, Sleep disorders. ", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention.", "Treatment": "The goals of treatment\u00a0are to help relieve pain and other symptoms, and to help a person cope with the symptoms.The first type of treatment may involve:Physical therapy, Exercise and fitness program, Stress-relief methods, including light massage and relaxation techniques . If these treatments do not work, your doctor may prescribe an antidepressant or muscle relaxant.The goal of these medicines is to improve your sleep and help you better tolerate pain., Medicine should be used along with exercise and behavior therapy., Duloxetine (Cymbalta), pregabalin (Lyrica), and milnacipran (Savella) are drugs that are approved specifically for treating fibromyalgia. . Other drugs are also used to treat the condition, such as:Anti-seizure drugs, such as gabapentin, Other antidepressants, such as amytriptyline, Muscle relaxants, such as cyclobenzeprine, Pain relievers,\u00a0but avoid narcotics, since they usually do not help, Sleeping aids . Cognitive-behavioral therapy is an important part of treatment. This therapy helps you learn how to:Deal with negative thoughts, Keep a diary of pain and symptoms, Recognize what makes your symptoms worse, Seek out enjoyable activities, Set limits . Support groups may also be helpful.Things you can do to help take care of yourself include:Eat a well-balanced diet., Avoid caffeine., Practice a good sleep routine to improve quality of sleep. , Exercise regularly, starting with low-level exercise., Try acupressure and acupuncture treatments.. Your doctor may refer you to a pain clinic if your condition is severe. "}, "Factitious hyperthyroidism": {"description": "Factitious hyperthyroidism is higher-than-normal thyroid hormone levels in the blood\u00a0that occur from taking too much thyroid hormone medication.", "Possible Complications": "When factitious hyperthyroidism lasts a long time, patients are at risk of having the same complications\u00a0as untreated or improperly treated hyperthyroidism caused by the thyroid gland.These complications include:Atrial fibrillation, Chest pain (angina), Heart attack, Irregular heart rhythm, Loss of bone mass (if severe, osteoporosis), Weight loss. ", "Symptoms": ["There is no goiter. The thyroid gland is usually small.", "The eyes do not bulge, as they do in Graves disease (the most common type of hyperthyroidism).", "The skin over the shins does not thicken, as it\u00a0sometimes does\u00a0in people who have Graves disease."], "Exams and Tests": "Tests used to diagnose\u00a0factitious hyperthyroidism include:Free T4, Radioactive iodine uptake, Thyroglobulin, Total T3, Total T4\u00a0, TSH. ", "Treatment": "You must stop taking thyroid hormone. If you need to take this medicine, you will\u00a0have to reduce the dosage.You should be re-checked in 2\u00a0- 4 weeks to be sure that the signs and symptoms of hyperthyroidism are gone. This also helps to confirm the diagnosis.People with Munchausen syndrome will need mental health treatment and follow-up.", "Causes": "The thyroid gland produces the hormones thyroxine (T4) and triiodothyronine (T3). In most cases of hyperthyroidism, the thyroid gland itself produces too much of these hormones.Hyperthyroidism can also be caused by taking too much thyroid hormone medication for hypothyroidism. This is called factitious hyperthyroidism. When this occurs because the prescribed dosage of hormone medication is too high, it is called iatrogenic, or doctor-induced, hyperthyroidism.Factitious hyperthyroidism can also occur when a patient intentionally takes too much thyroid hormone, such as in people:\r\n  Who have psychiatric disorders such as Munchausen syndrome\r\n  , \r\n  Who are trying to lose weight\r\n  , \r\n  Who want to get compensation from the insurance company \r\n  . Children may take thyroid hormone pills accidentally.In rare cases, factitious hyperthyroidism is caused by eating meat contaminated with thyroid gland tissue.", "Prevention": "Thyroid hormone should be taken only by prescription and under the supervision of a doctor."}, "Folate deficiency": {"description": "Folate deficiency means you have a lower than normal amount of folic acid, a type of B vitamin, in your blood.", "Possible Complications": "Complications include:Anemia (low red blood cell count), Low levels of white blood cells and platelets (in severe cases). In folate-deficiency anemia, the red blood cells are abnormally large (megaloblastic).Pregnant women need to get enough folic acid. The vitamin is important to the growth of the fetus\u2019 spinal cord and brain. Folic acid deficiency can cause severe birth defects known as neural tube defects.", "Symptoms": ["Fatigue", "Gray hair", "Mouth sores (ulcers)", "Poor growth", "Swollen tongue"], "Exams and Tests": "Folate deficiency can be diagnosed with a blood test. Pregnant women commonly have this blood test at prenatal checkups. ", "Causes": "Folic acid works with vitamin B12 and vitamin C to help the body break down, use, and make new proteins. The vitamin helps form red blood cells. It also helps produce DNA, the building block of the human body, which carries genetic information.Folic acid is water-soluble type of B vitamin. This means it is not stored in the fat tissues of the body. Leftover amounts of the vitamin leave the body through the urine.Because folate is not stored in the body in large amounts, your blood levels will get low after only a few weeks of eating a diet low in folate. Folate is found in green leafy vegetables and liver.Causes of folate deficiency are:Diseases in which folic acid is not well absorbed in the digestive system (such as celiac disease or Crohn's disease), Drinking too much alcohol, Eating overcooked vegetables, Hemolytic anemia, Certain medicines (such as phenytoin, sulfasalazine, or trimethoprim-sulfamethoxazole), Eating an unhealthy diet that not include enough fruits and vegetables . ", "Prevention": "The best way to get vitamins your body needs is to eat a balanced diet. Most people in the United States eat enough folic acid because it is plentiful in the food supply.Folate occurs naturally in the following foods:Beans and legumes, Citrus fruits and juices, Dark green leafy vegetables, Liver, Poultry, pork, and shellfish, Wheat bran and other whole grains. The Institute of Medicine's Food and Nutrition Board recommends that adults get 400 micrograms of folate daily. Women who could become pregnant should take folic acid supplements to ensure that they get enough each day.Specific recommendations depend on a person's age, gender, and other factors (such as pregnancy). Many foods now have extra folic acid added to help prevent birth defects."}, "Frozen shoulder": {"description": "Frozen shoulder is when the shoulder is painful and loses motion because of inflammation.", "Possible Complications": "Stiffness and pain continue even with therapy, The arm can break if the shoulder is moved forcefully during surgery. ", "Symptoms": ["Decreased motion of the shoulder", "Pain", "Stiffness"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will\u00a0ask about\u00a0your symptoms and an examine your shoulder. A diagnosis is often made when you\u00a0are not able to\u00a0rotate your shoulder.You may have x-rays of the shoulder. This is\u00a0to make sure there is no other problem, such as arthritis. Sometimes an MRI exam shows inflammation.\u00a0But imaging tests do not show specific signs to diagnose frozen shoulder.", "Treatment": "Pain is treated with nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory medications (NSAIDs) and steroid injections. Steroid injections plus physical therapy can improve your motion.It can take a few weeks to see progress. It may take as long as 6 - 9 months\u00a0for complete recovery. Physical therapy is intense and needs to be done every day.Left untreated, the condition\u00a0often gets better by itself within 2 years with little loss of motion.Risk factors for frozen shoulder, such as diabetes or thyroid problems, should also be treated.Surgery is recommended if nonsurgical treatment is not effective. This procedure (shoulder arthroscopy) is done under\u00a0anesthesia. During surgery the scar tissue is released\u00a0by bringing the shoulder through a full range of motion. Arthroscopic surgery can also be used to cut the tight ligaments and remove the scar tissue from the shoulder. After surgery, you may receive pain blocks so you can participate in physical therapy.", "Causes": "The capsule of the shoulder joint has ligaments that hold the shoulder bones to each other. When the capsule becomes inflamed, the shoulder bones are unable to move freely in the joint.Most of the time there is no cause for frozen shoulder. Risk factors include:Cervical disk disease of the neck, Diabetes, Shoulder injury, Shoulder surgery, Open heart surgery,  \r\nThyroid problems\u00a0\r\n . ", "Prevention": "The best way to prevent frozen shoulder is to contact your health care provider if you develop shoulder pain that limits your range of motion for an extended period. Early treatment and helps\u00a0prevent stiffness.People who have diabetes will be less likely to get frozen shoulder if they keep their condition under control."}, "Folate-deficiency anemia": {"description": "Anemia is a condition in which the body does not have enough healthy red blood cells. Red blood cells provide oxygen to body tissues.", "Possible Complications": "Symptoms of anemia can cause discomfort. In pregnant women, folate deficiency has been associated with neural tube or spinal defects (such as spina bifida) in the infant.Other, more severe complications may include:Curly graying hair, Increased skin color (pigment), Infertility, Worsening of heart disease or heart failure. ", "Symptoms": ["Fatigue", "Headache", "Pallor", "Sore mouth and tongue"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor or nurse will perform a physical exam. Tests that may be done include: \r\nComplete blood count (CBC), Red blood cell folate level . Rarely, a bone marrow examination may be done. ", "Treatment": "The goal is to identify and treat the cause of the folate deficiency.You may receive folic acid supplements by mouth or through a vein. If you have low folate levels because of a problem with your intestines, you may need treatment for the rest of your life. Diet changes can help boost your folate level. Eat more green, leafy vegetables and citrus fruits.", "Causes": "Folate (folic acid) is needed for red blood cells to form and grow. You can get folate by eating green leafy vegetables and liver. However, your body does not store folate in large amounts. So, you need to eat plenty of folate-rich foods to maintain normal levels of this vitamin.In folate-deficiency anemia, the red blood cells are abnormally large. Such cells are called megalocytes. They are also called megaloblasts. They are seen in the bone marrow. That is why this anemia is also called megaloblastic anemia.Causes of this type of anemia include:Too little folic acid in your diet, Hemolytic anemia, Long-term alcoholism, Use of certain medications (such as phenytoin [Dilantin], methotrexate, sulfasalazine, triamterene, pyrimethamine, trimethoprim-sulfamethoxazole, and barbiturates). The following raise your risk for this type of anemia:Alcoholism, Eating overcooked food, Poor diet (often seen in the poor, the elderly, and people who do not eat fresh fruits or vegetables), Pregnancy. Folic acid is needed to help a baby in the womb grow properly. Too little folic acid during pregnancy may lead to birth defects in a baby. For more information see: Folic acid and birth defect prevention", "Prevention": "Eating plenty of folate-rich foods can help prevent this condition. Experts recommend that women take 400 micrograms (mcg) of folic acid every day before\u00a0they get pregnant and through the first 3 months of their pregnancy."}, "Fragile X syndrome": {"description": "Fragile X syndrome is a genetic condition involving changes in part of the X chromosome. It is the most common form of inherited intellectual disability in boys.", "Possible Complications": "Complications vary depending on the type and severity of symptoms.Recurrent infections in children, Seizure disorder. Fragile X syndrome can be a cause of autism or related disorders, although not all children with fragile X syndrome have these conditions.", "Symptoms": ["Autism spectrum disorder", "Delay in crawling, walking, or twisting", "Hand clapping or hand biting", "Hyperactive or impulsive behavior", "Intellectual disability", "Speech and language delay", "Tendency to avoid eye contact ", "Flat feet", "Flexible joints and low muscle tone", "Large body size", "Large forehead or ears with a prominent jaw", "Long face", "Soft skin "], "Exams and Tests": "There are very few outward signs of Fragile X syndrome in babies. Some signs may include:Large head circumference in babies, Intellectual disability, Large testicles after the start of puberty, Subtle differences in face features. In females, excess shyness may be the only sign of the disorder.Genetic testing can diagnose this disease.", "Treatment": "There is no specific treatment for Fragile X syndrome. Instead, training and education have been developed to help affected children function at the highest possible level.", "Causes": "Fragile X syndrome is caused by a change in a gene called FMR1. A small part of the gene code is repeated on a fragile area of the X chromosome. The more repeats, the more likely the condition will occur.The FMR1 gene makes a protein needed for your brain to function properly. A defect in the gene makes your body produce too little of the protein, or none at all.Boys and girls can both be affected, but because boys have only one X chromosome, a single fragile X is likely to affect them more severely. You can have fragile X syndrome even if your parents do not have it.A family history of fragile X syndrome, developmental problems, or intellectual disability may not be present.", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling may be helpful if you have a family history of this syndrome and are planning to become pregnant."}, "Familial lipoprotein lipase deficiency": {"description": "Familial lipoprotein lipase deficiency is a group of rare genetic disorders in which a person lacks a protein needed to break down fat molecules. The disorder causes a large amount of fat to build up in the blood.", "Possible Complications": "Pancreatitis and recurrent episodes of abdominal pain may develop.Xanthomas are not usually painful unless they are rubbed a lot.", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain (may appear as colic in infancy)", "Loss of appetite", "Nausea", "Pain in the muscles and bones (musculoskeletal pain)", "Vomiting"], "Exams and Tests": "Signs of this condition include:Enlarged liver, Failure to thrive in infancy, Fatty deposits in the skin (xanthomas), High triglyceride levels in the blood, Pale retinas and white-colored blood vessels in the retinas, Pancreatitis that keeps returning, Yellowing of the eyes and skin (jaundice). Blood tests will be done to check cholesterol and triglyceride levels. Rarely, a special blood test may be done after you are given blood thinners through a vein. This test looks for lipoprotein lipase activity in your blood.Genetic tests may be done, including one for apolipoprotein CII deficiency.", "Treatment": "Treatment aims to control the symptoms and blood triglyceride levels with a very low-fat diet. You should eat no more than 20 grams of fat per day to prevent the symptoms from coming back.Twenty grams of fat is equal to one of the following:2 8-ounce glasses of whole milk, 4 teaspoons of margarine, 4-ounce serving of meat. The average American diet has a fat content of up to 45% of total calories. Fat-soluble vitamins A, D, E, and K and mineral supplements are recommended for people who eat a very low-fat diet. Dietary counseling may be helpful for patients who are trying to stick to a strict diet and still get enough calories and nutrients.Pancreatitis that is related to lipoprotein lipase deficiency responds to treatments for that disorder.", "Causes": "Familial lipoprotein lipase deficiency is caused by a defective gene that is passed down through families.Persons with this condition lack an enzyme called lipoprotein lipase. Without this enzyme, the body cannot break down fat from digested food. Fat particles called chylomicrons build up in the blood.Risk factors include a family history of lipoprotein lipase deficiency.The disorder affects about 1 out of 1,000,000 people. The condition is usually first seen during infancy or childhood.", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention for this rare, inherited disorder. Awareness of risks may allow early detection. Following a very low-fat diet can dramatically improve the symptoms of this disease."}, "Fibrous dysplasia": {"description": "Fibrous dysplasia is a bone disease that destroys and replaces normal bone with fibrous bone tissue. One or more bones can be affected.", "Possible Complications": "Cushing's disease, Gigantism or acromegaly, Heart rhythm disturbance, Hyperthyroidism, Rickets. ", "Symptoms": ["Bone pain", "Bone sores (lesions)", "Difficulty walking", "Endocrine gland problems", "Fractures or bone deformities (rare)", "Unusual skin color (pigmentation)"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical examination. X-rays of bones are taken.", "Treatment": "There is no cure for fibrous dysplasia. Bone fractures or deformities are treated as appropriate. The patient is screened for endocrine disorders as needed.", "Causes": "Fibrous dysplasia occurs in childhood, usually between ages 3 - 15. The condition does not run in families (not hereditary), and the cause is unknown.", "Prevention": "There is no known way to prevent fibrous dysplasia. Treatment aims to prevent complications, such as recurrent bone fractures, to help make the condition less severe."}, "Fish tapeworm": {"description": "Fish tapeworm is an infection with a parasite found in fish.", "Possible Complications": "Megaloblastic anemia, Intestinal blockage (rare). ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal discomfort or pain", "Diarrhea", "Weakness", "Weight loss"], "Exams and Tests": "People who are infected sometimes pass segments of worm in their stools. These segments can be seen in the stool.Tests may include:Complete blood count, including differential, Blood tests to determine the cause of anemia, Vitamin B12 level, Stool examination for eggs and parasites . ", "Treatment": "You will receive medicines to fight the parasites. You take these medicines by mouth, usually in a single dose.The drug of choice for tapeworm infections is praziquantal. Niclosamide can also be used. You may need vitamin B12 injections or supplements to treat\u00a0the vitamin B12 deficiency and anemia that can occur with this infection.", "Causes": "The fish tapeworm (Diphyllobothrium latum), is the largest parasite that infects humans. Humans become infected when they eat raw or undercooked freshwater fish that contain fish tapeworm cysts.The infection is seen in many areas where humans eat uncooked or undercooked fish from rivers or lakes, including:African countries in which freshwater fish are eaten, Eastern Europe, North and South America, Scandinavia, Some Asian countries. After a person has eaten infected fish, the larva begin to grow in the intestine. Larvae are fully grown in 3 - 6 weeks. The adult worm, which is segmented, may reach a length of 30 feet. Eggs are formed in each segment of the worm and are passed in the stool. Sometimes, parts of the worm may also be passed in the stool.Fish tapeworm infection may lead to vitamin B12 deficiency and anemia.", "Prevention": "Avoiding raw freshwater fish and cooking fish enough (to more than 140 degrees F for 5 minutes) will prevent infection with the fish tapeworm. Freezing fish to -4 degrees F for 24 hours also kills fish tapeworm eggs."}, "Factor V deficiency": {"description": "Factor V deficiency is a condition that is passed down through families, which affects the ability of the blood to clot.", "Possible Complications": "Severe bleeding (hemorrhage) could occur.", "Symptoms": ["Bleeding into the skin", "Bleeding of the gums", "Excessive bruising", "Nosebleeds", "Prolonged or excessive loss of blood with surgery or trauma", "Umbilical stump bleeding "], "Exams and Tests": "Factor V assay, Blood clotting tests, including partial thromboplastin time (PTT) and prothrombin time, Bleeding time. ", "Treatment": "You will be given fresh blood plasma or fresh frozen plasma infusions during a bleeding episode or after surgery. These treatments will correct the deficiency temporarily.", "Causes": "Blood clotting is a complex process involving as many as 20 different proteins in blood plasma. These proteins are called blood coagulation factors. Factor V deficiency is caused by a lack of Factor V. When certain blood clotting factors are low or missing, your blood does not clot properly. Factor V deficiency is rare. It may be caused by: A defective Factor V gene passed down through families (inherited), An antibody that interferes with normal Factor V function . You can get an antibody that interferes with Factor V:After giving birth, After being treated with a certain type of fibrin glue, After surgery, With autoimmune diseases and certain cancers. Sometimes the cause is unknown.The disease is similar to hemophilia, except bleeding into joints is less common. In the inherited form of Factor V deficiency, a family history of a bleeding disorder is a risk factor."}, "Factor II deficiency": {"description": "Factor II deficiency is a blood clotting (coagulation) problem that occurs when there is a lack of a substance called prothrombin.", "Possible Complications": "Severe bleeding, even into the brain, can occur.", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal bleeding after childbirth", "Abnormal menstrual bleeding", "Bleeding after surgery", "Bleeding after trauma", "Bruising", "Nosebleeds", "Umbilical cord bleeding at birth"], "Exams and Tests": "Factor II assay, Partial thromboplastin time, Prothrombin time (PT), Mixing study. ", "Treatment": "You can control blood loss by getting infusions of fresh or frozen plasma or concentrates of clotting factors into the blood. If a lack of vitamin K is causing the problem, you can take vitamin K by mouth, through injections under the skin, or through a vein (intravenously). Knowing that you have a bleeding disorder helps the doctor can take extra care if you need surgery. It also lets you alert also tell other family members who may have the same problem.", "Causes": "When you bleed, series of reactions take place in the body that help healthy blood clots form. This is called the coagulation cascade. The process involves special proteins called coagulation or clotting factors. You may have a higher chance of excess bleeding when one or more of these clotting factors are missing. This disorder occurs when the body does not have enough an important blood clotting protein called factor II. The condition runs in families (inherited) and is very rare. Both parents must have the gene to pass the disorder to their children. A family history of a bleeding disorder can be a risk factor.Watch this video about:Blood clottingMost commonly, factor II deficiency is caused by:Lack of vitamin K due to long-term use of antibiotics, bile duct obstruction, or poor absorption of vitamin K from the intestines. Some babies are born with vitamin K deficiency., Severe liver disease, Use of drugs that prevent clotting (anticoagulants such as warfarin or Coumadin). ", "Prevention": "Genetic counseling may be helpful for disorders that start at birth (congenital). When a lack of vitamin K is the cause, using vitamin K can help."}, "Face powder poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Blurred vision", "Breathing difficulty", "Burning pain in the throat", "Burns to the eye (if you get it in your eye)", "Diarrhea (watery, bloody)", "Rash", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Fibrocystic breast disease": {"Symptoms": ["Pain or discomfort in both breasts", "Pain that commonly comes and goes with the period, but may last through the whole month", "Breasts that feel full, swollen, and heavy", "Pain or discomfort under the arms", "Thick or lumpy breasts "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will examine you. This will include a breast exam. Tell your doctor or nurse if you have noticed any breast changes. If you are over 40, ask your doctor or nurse how often you should have a mammogram to screen for breast cancer. For women under 35, a breast ultrasound may be used to look more closely at breast tissue.You may need further tests if a lump was found during a breast exam or your mammogram result was abnormal. Another mammogram and breast ultrasound may be done. ", "description": "Fibrocystic breast disease is a common way to describe painful, lumpy breasts.  ", "Causes": "The exact cause of the condition is not known. Hormones made in the ovaries may make a woman's breasts feel swollen, lumpy, or painful before or during menstruation each month. Up to half of women have this problem at some time during their life. It is most common between the ages of 20 and 45. It is rare in women after menopause, unless they are taking estrogen.", "Treatment": "Women who have no symptoms or only mild symptoms do not need treatment.Your health care provider may recommend the following self-care measures:Take over-the-counter medicine such as acetaminophen or ibuprofen, Apply heat or ice on the breast, Wear a well-fitting or sports bra. Some women believe that eating less fat, caffeine, or chocolate helps with their symptoms. But there is no evidence that these measures help.Vitamin E, thiamine, magnesium, and evening primrose oil are not harmful in most cases. Studies have not shown these to be helpful. Talk with your health care provider before taking any medicine or supplement.For more severe symptoms, your health care provider may prescribe hormones, such as birth control pills or other medicine. Take the medicine exactly as instructed. Be sure to let your provider know if you have side effects from the medicine.Surgery is never done to treat this condition."}, "Fire ants": {"Symptoms": ["Swelling, redness, itchiness, and pain around the site of bite", "Pus-filled blisters that last 3 - 8 days", "Possible scab at the area of the bite that lasts 3 - 10 days", "Difficulty breathing", "Rapid heart rate", "Throat swelling"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Felty syndrome": {"description": "Felty syndrome is a disorder that involves rheumatoid arthritis, a swollen spleen, decreased white blood cell count, and repeated infections. It is rare.", "Possible Complications": "You may have infections that keep coming back.", "Symptoms": ["General feeling of discomfort (malaise)\r\n", "Fatigue\r\n", "Loss of appetite\r\n", "Unintentional weight loss\r\n", "Pale-looking skin\r\n", "Joint swelling, stiffness, pain, and deformity\r\n", "Recurrent infections\r\n", "Eye burning or discharge"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam will show:Swollen spleen, Joints that show signs of rheumatoid arthritis, Possibly swollen liver and lymph nodes. A complete blood count ( CBC) may show\u00a0a lower\u00a0number of white blood cells called neutrophils.An abdominal ultrasound may confirm a swollen spleen.", "Treatment": "Persons with this syndrome are usually already receiving treatment for rheumatoid arthritis. They may need other medicines to suppress their immune system.Methotrexate may improve the low white blood cell count.Some people benefit from removal of the spleen (splenectomy).", "Causes": "The cause of Felty syndrome is unknown. It is more common in people who have had rheumatoid arthritis for a long time. People with this syndrome are at risk of infection because they have a low white blood cell count.", "Prevention": "Prompt treatment of rheumatoid arthritis may decrease the risk of developing Felty syndrome."}, "Facial tics": {"description": "A facial tic is a repeated spasm, often involving the eyes and muscles of the face.", "Possible Complications": "In most cases, there are no complications.", "Symptoms": ["Eye blinking", "Grimacing", "Mouth twitching", "Nose wrinkling", "Squinting"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will usually diagnose a tic during a physical examination. No special tests are needed. In rare cases, an EEG may be done to look for seizures, which can be the source of tics.", "Treatment": "Short-lived childhood tics are not treated. Calling the child's attention to a tic may make it worse or cause it to continue. A non-stressful environment can make tics occur less often, and help them go away more quickly. Stress reduction programs may also be helpful.If tics severely affect a person's life, medicines may help control them.", "Causes": "Tics most often occur in children, but may last into adulthood. Tics occur three to four times as often in boys as girls. Tics may affect as many as one-fourth of all children at some time.The cause of tics is unknown, but stress appears to make tics worse.Short-lived tics (transient tic disorder) are common in childhood.A chronic motor tic disorder also exists. It may last for years. This form is very rare compared to the common short-lived childhood tic. Tourette syndrome is a separate condition in which tics are a major symptom.", "Prevention": "Many cases cannot be prevented. Reducing stress may be helpful. Sometimes counseling can help your child learn how to cope with stress."}, "Food poisoning": {"description": "Food poisoning occurs when you swallow food or water that contains bacteria, parasites, viruses, or the toxins made by these germs. Most cases are caused by common bacteria such as Staphylococcus or E. coli.", "Possible Complications": "Dehydration is the most common complication. This can occur from any causes of food poisoning.Less common, but much more serious complications depend on the bacteria that are causing the food poisoning. These may include:\r\nArthritis, Bleeding problems, Damage to the nervous system, Kidney problems, Swelling or irritation in the tissue around the heart. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal cramps", "Diarrhea (may be bloody)", "Fever and chills", "Headache", "Nausea and vomiting", "Weakness (may be serious) "], "Exams and Tests": "Your health care provider will look for signs of food poisoning. These may include pain in the stomach and signs your body has too little fluid (dehydration). Tests may be done on your stools or the food you have eaten to find out what type of germ is causing your symptoms. However, tests may not always find the cause of the diarrhea. In more serious cases, your health care provider may order a sigmoidoscopy. This test uses a thin, hollow tube with a light on the end that is laced in the anus to look for the source of bleeding or infection. ", "Treatment": "Most of the time, you will get better in a couple of days. The goal is to ease symptoms and make sure your body has the proper amount of fluids. Getting enough fluids and learning what to eat will help keep you comfortable. You may need to: Manage the diarrhea, Control nausea and vomiting, Get plenty of rest . You can drink oral rehydration mixtures to replace fluids and minerals lost through vomiting and diarrhea. Oral rehydration powder can be purchased from a pharmacy. Be sure to mix the powder in safe water. You can make your own mixture by dissolving \u00bd teaspoonful each salt and baking soda and 4 tablespoonsful of sugar in 4 \u00bc cups (1 liter) water. If you have diarrhea and are unable to drink or keep down fluids, you may need fluids given through a vein (by IV). This may be more common in young children. If you take diuretics, ask your health care provider if you need to stop taking the diuretic while you have diarrhea. Never stop or change medicines before talking to your doctor. For the most common causes of food poisoning, your doctor will NOT prescribe antibiotics. You can buy medicines at the drugstore that help slow diarrhea. Do not use these medicines without talking to your health care provider if you have bloody diarrhea, a fever, or the diarrhea is severe., Do not give these medicines to children. . ", "Causes": "Food poisoning can affect one person or a group of people who all ate the same food. It is more common after eating at picnics, school cafeterias, large social functions, or restaurants. When germs get into the food, it is called contamination. This can happen in different ways:Meat or poultry can come into contact with bacteria from the intestines of an animal that is being processed., Water that is used during growing or shipping can contain animal or human waste., Food may be handled in an unsafe way during preparation in grocery stores, restaurants, or homes. . Food poisoning can occur after eating or drinking: Any food prepared by someone who does not wash their hands properly, Any food prepared using cooking utensils, cutting boards, and other tools that are not fully cleaned, Dairy products or food containing mayonnaise (such as coleslaw or potato salad) that have been out of the refrigerator too long, Frozen or refrigerated foods that are not stored at the proper temperature or are not reheated to the right temperature, Raw fish or oysters, Raw fruits or vegetables that have not been washed well, Raw vegetables or fruit juices and dairy products (look for the word \"pasteurized,\" which means the food has been treated to prevent contamination), Undercooked meats or eggs, Water from a well or stream, or city or town water that has not been treated . Many types of germs and toxins may cause food poisoning, including: Campylobacter enteritis, Cholera, E. coli enteritis, Toxins in spoiled or tainted fish or shellfish, Staphylococcus aureus, Salmonella, Shigella . Infants and elderly people are at the greatest risk for food poisoning. You are also at higher risk if: You have a serious medical condition, such as kidney disease, diabetes, cancer, or HIV and/or AIDS., You have a weakened immune system., You travel outside of the United States to areas where you are exposed to germs that cause food poisoning. . Pregnant and breastfeeding women should use extra care to avoid food poisoning. "}, "Failure to thrive": {"description": "Failure to thrive refers to children whose current weight or rate of weight gain is much lower than that of other children of similar age and gender.", "Possible Complications": "Permanent mental, emotional, or physical delays can occur.", "Symptoms": ["Height, weight, and head circumference do not match standard growth charts", "Weight is lower than 3rd percentile of standard growth charts or 20% below the ideal weight for their height", "Growth may have slowed or stopped", "Physical skills such as rolling over, sitting, standing and walking", "Mental and social skills", "Secondary sexual characteristics (delayed in adolescents)", "Constipation", "Excessive crying", "Excessive sleepiness (lethargy)", "Irritability"], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam and check the child's height, weight, and body shape.\u00a0Parents will be asked about the child's medical and family history.A special test called the Denver Developmental Screening Test will be used to show any delays in development. A growth chart outlining all types of growth since birth is created.The following tests may be done:Complete blood count (CBC), Electrolyte balance, Hemoglobin electrophoresis to check for conditions such as sickle cell disease, Hormone studies, including thyroid function tests, X-rays to determine bone age, Urinalysis. ", "Treatment": "Treatment depends on the cause of the delayed growth and development. Delayed growth due to nutritional\u00a0problems can be helped by showing the parents how to provide a well-balanced diet.Do not give your child dietary supplements such as Boost or Ensure without talking to your health care provider first.Other treatment depends on how severe the condition is. The following may be recommended:Increase the number of calories and amount of fluid the infant receives, Correct any vitamin or mineral deficiencies, Identify and treat any other medical conditions. The child may need to stay in the hospital for a little while.Treatment may also involve improving the family relationships and living conditions.", "Causes": "Failure to thrive may be caused by medical problems or factors in the child\u2019s environment, such as abuse or neglect.There are many medical causes of failure to thrive. These include:Problems with genes such as Down syndrome, Organ problems, Hormone problems, Damage to the brain or central nervous system, which may cause feeding difficulties in an infant, Heart or lung problems, which can affect how nutrients move through the body, Anemia or other blood disorders, Gastrointestinal problems that make it hard to absorb nutrients or cause a lack of digestive enzymes, Long-term (chronic) infections, Metabolism problems, Problems during pregnancy\u00a0or low birth weight. Factors in the child\u2019s environment include:Loss of emotional bond between parent and child, Poverty, Problems with child-caregiver relationship, Parents do not understand the appropriate diet needs for their the child, Exposure to infections, parasites, or toxins, Poor eating habits, such as eating in front of the television and not having formal meal times. Many times the cause cannot be determined.", "Prevention": "Regular checkups can help detect failure to thrive in children."}, "Fleas": {"description": "Fleas are small insects that feed on the blood of humans, dogs, cats, and other warm-blooded animals. ", "Possible Complications": "Scratching can lead to a skin infection.", "Symptoms": ["Has small bumps, often three bumps together, that may itch and bleed", "May be located on the armpit or fold of a joint (at the elbow, knee, or ankle)", "Turns white when pressed", "May develop in skin folds, such as under breasts or in the groin "], "Exams and Tests": "A skin biopsy is sometimes done.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to get rid of the fleas. This can be done by treating your home, pets, and outside areas with chemicals (pesticides). Small children should not be in the home when pesticides are being used. Birds and fish must be protected when chemicals are sprayed. Home foggers and flea collars do not always work to get rid of fleas. If home treatments do not work, you may need to get professional pest control help.You can use an over-the-counter 1% hydrocortisone cream to relieve itching. Antihistamines you take by mouth may also help with itching.", "Causes": "Fleas prefer to live on dogs and cats. They may also be found on humans and other warm-blooded animals.Pet owners may not be bothered by fleas until their pet has been gone for a long period of time. Fleas look for other sources of food and begin to bite humans. Bites often occur around the waist, ankles, armpits, and in the bend of the elbows and knees.", "Prevention": "Prevention may not always be possible. Use of chemical sprays may be helpful if fleas are common in your area. Professional\u00a0pest control\u00a0may be needed in some cases."}, "Furniture polish poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Agitation", "Confusion", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Dizziness", "Breathing difficulty", "Low blood pressure that develops rapidly", "Severe pain in the throat, mouth area, nose, eyes, or ears", "Severe stomach pain", "Throat swelling", "Vomiting, possibly bloody", "Blood in your stools ", "Skin burns and irritation", "Vision loss "], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Familial Mediterranean fever": {"description": "Familial Mediterranean fever is a disorder passed down through families (inherited), which involves repeated fevers and inflammation that often affects the lining of the abdomen, chest, or joints.", "Possible Complications": "A serious complication is amyloidosis, a condition in which abnormal proteins build up in the organs and joints. ", "Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Chest pain that is sharp and gets worse when taking a breath", "Fever or alternating chills and fever", "Joint pain", "Skin sores (lesions) that are red and swollen and range from 5 - 20 cm in diameter "], "Exams and Tests": "If genetic testing shows that you have the mutation associated with this condition, and your symptoms match a typical pattern, the diagnosis is nearly certain.\u00a0Laboratory tests or x-rays\u00a0can rule\u00a0out other possible diseases to help make the diagnosis.Certain blood tests may be higher than normal when done during an attack. Tests may include:Complete blood count (CBC), C-reactive protein, Erythrocyte sedimentation rate (ESR), Fibrinogen test, White blood cell count. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment for familial Mediterranean fever is to control symptoms. Colchicine, a medicine that reduces inflammation, may help during an attack and may prevent further attacks. It can also help prevent a serious complication called systemic amyloidosis.", "Causes": "Familial Mediterranean fever is most often caused by a mutation in the MEFV gene. This gene creates proteins involved in inflammation.The condition usually affects people of Mediterranean ancestry, especially non-Ashkenazi (Sephardic) Jews, Armenians, and Arabs. People from other ethnic groups may also be affected.This disease is very rare. Risk factors include a family history of familial Mediterranean fever\u00a0and Mediterranean ancestry."}, "Female pattern baldness": {"description": "Female pattern baldness is the most common type of hair loss in women.", "Symptoms": ["Hair thins mainly on the top and crown of the scalp. It usually starts with a widening through the center hair part.", "The front hairline remains unaffected except for normal recession, which happens to everyone as time passes.", "The hair loss rarely progresses to total or near total baldness, as it may in men."], "Exams and Tests": "Female pattern baldness is usually diagnosed based on:Ruling out other causes of hair loss., The appearance and pattern of hair loss., Your medical history. . The doctor will examine you for other signs of too much male hormone (androgen), such as:Abnormal new hair growth, such as on the face or between the belly button and pubic area, Changes in menstrual periods and enlargement of the clitoris, New acne . A skin biopsy or other procedures or blood tests may be used to diagnose skin disorders that cause hair loss.Looking at the hair under a microsope may be done to check for problems with the structure of the hair shaft itself.", "Causes": "Each strand of hair sits in a tiny hole (cavity) in the skin called a follicle. In general, baldness occurs when the hair follicle shrinks over time, resulting in shorter and finer hair. Eventually, the follicle does not grow new hair. The follicles remain alive, which suggests that it is still possible to grow new hair.The reason for female pattern baldness is not well understood, but may be related to:Aging, Changes in the levels of androgens (male hormones). For example, after reaching menopause, many women find that the hair on their head is thinner, while the hair on their face is coarser., Family history of male or female pattern baldness. . ", "Prevention": "There is no known prevention for female pattern baldness.", "Treatment": "Hair loss in female pattern baldness is permanent, if not treated. In most cases, hair loss is mild to moderate. You do not need treatment if you are comfortable with your appearance.MEDICATIONThe only medication approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) to treat female pattern baldness is minoxidil:It is applied to the scalp., For women, the 2% concentration is recommended., Minoxidil may help hair grow in about 1 in 4 or 5 of women. In most women, it may slow or stop hair loss., You must continue to use this medicine for a long time. Hair loss starts again when you stop using it. . If minoxidil does not work, your doctor may recommend other medicines, such as spironolactone, cimetidine, birth control pills, ketoconazole, among others. Your doctor can tell you more about these if needed. HAIR TRANSPLANTDuring hair transplant, tiny plugs of hair are removed from areas where hair is thicker, and placed (transplanted) in areas that are balding. Minor scarring may occur where hair is removed. There is a slight risk of skin infection. You will likely need many transplants, which can be expensive. However, the results are often excellent and permanent.OTHER SOLUTIONSHair weaving, hairpieces, or a change in hairstyle can help hide hair loss and improve your appearance. This is often the least expensive and safest way to deal with female pattern baldness."}, "Flu": {"description": "This article discusses influenza types A and B. Another type of the flu is the swine flu (H1N1).", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Pneumonia, Encephalitis (infection of the brain), Meningitis, Seizures . ", "Symptoms": ["Body aches", "Chills", "Dizziness", "Flushed face", "Headache", "Lack of energy", "Nausea and vomiting ", "Dry cough", "Increased symptoms that affect breathing", "Runny nose (clear and watery)", "Sneezing", "Sore throat "], "Exams and Tests": "Most people do not need to see a health care provider when they have flu symptoms. This is because most people are not at risk for a severe case of the flu.If you are very sick with the flu, you may want to see your health care provider. People who are at high risk for flu complications may also want to see a health care provider if they get the flu.When many people in an area have flu, a health care provider can make a diagnosis after hearing about your symptoms. No further testing is needed.There is a test to detect the flu. It is done by swabbing the nose or throat. Most of the time, test results are available very fast. The test can help your health care provider prescribe the best treatment.", "Treatment": "HOME CAREAcetaminophen (Tylenol) and ibuprofen (Advil, Motrin) help lower fever. Health care providers sometimes\u00a0suggest that you use both types of medicine. Do NOT use aspirin.A fever does not need to come all the way down to normal. Most people feel better when the temperature drops by 1 degree.Over-the-counter cold medicines may make some of your symptoms better. Cough drops or throat sprays will help with your sore throat.You will need a lot of rest. Drink plenty of liquids. Do not smoke or drink alcohol.ANTIVIRAL DRUGSMost people with milder symptoms feel better in 3 to 4 days. They do not need to see a health care provider or take antiviral medicines.Health care providers may give antiviral drugs to people who get very sick with the flu. You may need these medicines if you are more likely to have flu complications.These medicines may shorten the time you have symptoms by about 1 day. They work better if you start taking them within 2 days of your first symptoms.Children at risk of a severe case of the flu may also need these medicines.", "Causes": "The flu is caused by an influenza virus. Most people get the flu when they breathe in tiny airborne droplets from the coughs or sneezes of someone who has the flu. You can also catch the flu if you touch something with the virus on it, and then touch your mouth, nose, or eyes.People often confuse colds and flu. They are different, but you might have some of the same symptoms. Most people get a cold several times a year. On the contrary, people get the flu only once every few years.Sometimes, you can get a virus that makes you throw up or have diarrhea. Some people call this the \"stomach flu.\" This is a misleading name because this virus is not the actual flu. The flu mostly affects your nose, throat, and lungs.", "Prevention": "You can take steps to avoid catching or spreading the flu. The best step is to get a flu vaccine. If you have the flu: Stay in your apartment, dorm room, or home for at least 24 hours after your fever has gone., Wear a mask if you leave your room., Avoid sharing food, utensils, cups, or bottles., Use hand sanitizer often during the day and always after touching your face., Cover your mouth with a tissue when coughing and throw it away after use., Cough into your sleeve if a tissue is not available. Avoid touching your eyes, nose, and mouth. . The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) recommends that everyone 6 months and older should receive the influenza vaccine."}, "Fungal arthritis": {"description": "Fungal arthritis is infection of a joint by a fungus.", "Possible Complications": "Joint damage can occur if the infection is not treated right away.", "Symptoms": ["Arthritis", "Fever", "Joint pain", "Joint stiffness", "Joint swelling", "Swelling of the ankles, feet, and legs"], "Exams and Tests": "Culture of joint fluid that grows fungus, Joint x-ray showing joint changes, Positive antibody test (serology) for fungal disease, Synovial biopsy showing fungus. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to cure the infection using antifungal drugs. The most commonly used antifungal drugs are amphotericin B or medications in the azole family (fluconazole, ketoconazole, or itraconazole).Chronic or advanced bone or joint infection may require surgery (debridement) to remove the infected tissue.", "Causes": "Fungal arthritis, also called mycotic arthritis, is a rare condition. This disease can be caused by any of the invasive types of fungi. These organisms may affect bone or joint tissue. One or more joints may be affected, most often the large, weight-bearing joints, especially the knees.Conditions that can cause fungal arthritis include:Blastomycosis, Candidiasis, Coccidioidomycosis, Cryptococcosis, Histoplasmosis, Sporotrichosis, \r\n  Exserohilum rostratum\r\n  . The infection sometimes occurs as a result of an infection in another organ such as the lungs, and tends to get worse very slowly. The large joints are most often affected. People with weakened immune systems who travel or live in endemic areas are more susceptible to most causes of fungal arthritis.For exserohilum rostratum arthritis, the major risk factor is injection with contaminated steroid vials.", "Prevention": "Thorough treatment of fungal infections elsewhere in the body may help prevent fungal arthritis."}, "Facial trauma": {"description": "Facial trauma is an injury of the face and upper jaw bone (maxilla).", "Possible Complications": "Complications may include:Bleeding, Uneven face, Infection, Brain and nervous system problems, Numbness or weakness, Loss of vision or double vision . ", "Symptoms": ["Changes in feeling over the face", "Deformed or uneven face or facial bones", "Difficulty breathing through the nose due to swelling and bleeding", "Double vision", "Missing teeth", "Swelling around the eyes that may cause vision problems "], "Exams and Tests": "The doctor will perform a physical exam, which may show:Bleeding from the nose, eyes, or mouth, Nasal blockage, Breaks in the skin (lacerations), Bruising around the eyes or widening of the distance between the eyes, which may mean injury to the bones between the eye sockets, Changes in vision or the movement of the eyes. The following may suggest bone fractures:Abnormal feelings on the cheek, Irregularities of the face that can be felt by touching, Movement of the upper jaw when the head is still. A CT scan of the head and bones of the face may be done.", "Treatment": "Surgery is done if the injury prevents normal functioning or causes a major deformity.The goal of treatment is to:Control bleeding, Create a clear airway, Treat the fracture and fix broken bone segments , Prevent scars if possible, Rule out other injuries. Treatment should be done as soon as possible if the person is stable and does not have a neck fracture. ", "Causes": "Facial injuries can affect upper jaw, lower jaw, cheek, nose, or forehead. They may be caused by blunt force or be the result of a wound. Common causes of injury to the face include:Car and motorcycle crashes, Wounds , Sports injuries, Violence . ", "Prevention": "Wear seat belts while driving.Use protective head gear when doing work or activities that could injure the face."}, "Foxglove poisoning": {"Symptoms": ["Blurred vision", "Confusion", "Depression", "Disorientation or hallucinations", "Fainting", "Halos around objects (yellow, green, white)", "Headache", "Irregular or slow heartbeat", "Lethargy", "Loss of appetite", "Low blood pressure", "Rash or hives", "Stomach pain", "Vomiting, nausea, or diarrhea", "Weakness or drowsiness"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Do not touch or eat any plant with which you are not familiar. Wash your hands after working in the garden or walking in the woods."}, "Facial nerve palsy due to birth trauma": {"description": "Facial nerve palsy due to birth trauma is the loss of controllable (voluntary) muscle movement in an infant's face due to pressure on a certain nerve in the face just before or at the time of birth.", "Possible Complications": "In some cases, the muscles on the affected side of the face become permanently paralyzed.", "Symptoms": ["Eyelid may not close on affected side", "Lower face (below eyes) appears uneven during crying", "Mouth does not move down the same way on both sides while crying", "No movement (paralysis) on the affected side of the face (from the forehead to the chin in severe cases)"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam is usually all that is needed to diagnose this condition. In rare cases, a nerve conduction study is needed. This test can pinpoint the exact location of the nerve injury.Brain imaging tests are not needed unless your doctor thinks there is another problem (such as a tumor or stroke).", "Treatment": "In most cases, the infant will be closely monitored to see if the paralysis goes away on its own.Infants with permanent paralysis need special therapy.", "Causes": "An infant's facial nerve (also called the seventh cranial nerve) can be damaged just before or at the time of delivery.Most of the time the cause is unknown. But a difficult delivery, with or without the use of an instrument called forceps, may lead to this condition.Some factors that can cause birth trauma (injury) include:Large baby size (may be seen if the mother has diabetes), Long pregnancy or labor, Use of epidural anesthesia, Use of a medication to cause labor and stronger contractions . Most of the time, these factors do not lead to facial nerve palsy or birth trauma.", "Prevention": "There is no guaranteed way to prevent pressure injuries in the unborn child. The proper use of forceps and improved childbirth methods have reduced the rate of facial nerve palsy."}, "Frostbite": {"Symptoms": ["Pins and needles feeling, followed by numbness", "Hard, pale, and cold skin that has been exposed to the cold for too long", "Aching, throbbing or lack of feeling in the affected area", "Red and extremely painful skin and muscle as the area thaws", "Blisters", "Gangrene (blackened, dead tissue)", "Damage to tendons, muscles, nerves, and bone", "If the frostbite did not affect your blood vessels, a complete recovery is possible.", "If the frostbite affected the blood vessels, the damage is permanent. Gangrene may occur. This may require removal of the affected body part (amputation). "], "Causes": "Frostbite occurs when the skin and body tissues are exposed to cold temperature for a long period of time. You are more likely to develop frostbite if you:Take medicines called beta-blockers, Have poor blood supply to the legs, Smoke, Have diabetes, Have Raynaud's phenomenon. ", "description": "Frostbite is damage to the skin and underlying tissues caused by extreme cold. Frostbite is the most common freezing injury.", "Prevention": "Be aware of factors that can contribute to frostbite. These include extreme:Wet clothes, High winds, Poor blood circulation. Poor circulation can be caused by tight clothing or boots, cramped positions, fatigue, certain medications, smoking, alcohol use, or diseases that affect the blood vessels, such as diabetes.. Wear clothing that protects you well against the cold. Protect exposed areas. In cold weather, wear mittens (not gloves); wind-proof, water-resistant, layered clothing; two pairs of socks; and a hat or scarf that covers the ears (to avoid heat loss through the scalp).If you expect to be exposed to the cold for a long period of time, don't drink alcohol or smoke. Make sure to get enough food and rest.If caught in a severe snowstorm, find shelter early or increase physical activity to maintain body warmth."}, "Fifth disease": {"description": "Fifth disease is caused by a virus that leads to a rash on the cheeks, arms, and legs.", "Possible Complications": "Fifth disease usually doesn't cause complications in most people. If you are pregnant and think you may have been exposed to someone with the virus, tell your health care provider. Usually there's no problem. Most pregnant women are immune to the virus. Your doctor can test you to see if you are immune. Women who are not immune usually only have mild symptoms. However, the virus can cause anemia in an unborn baby and even cause miscarriage. This is uncommon and occurs only in a small percentage of women, usually in the first half of pregnancy.There's also a higher risk of complications in people with: A weak immune system, such as from cancer, leukemia, or HIV infection, Certain blood problems such as sickle cell anemia . Fifth disease can cause severe anemia, which will need medical treatment.", "Symptoms": ["Fever", "Headache", "Runny nose ", "The tell-tale sign of this illness is bright-red cheeks. This is often called a \"slapped-cheek\" rash.", "The rash appears on the arms and legs and middle of the body, and it may itch.", "The rash comes and goes and usually disappears in about 2 weeks. It fades from the center outwards, so it looks lacy. "], "Exams and Tests": "Your doctor will examine the rash. Usually this is enough to diagnose the disease.Your doctor can also do blood tests to look for signs of the virus, although it's usually not needed. The doctor may choose to do a blood test in certain situations, such as for pregnant women or people with anemia. ", "Treatment": "There's no treatment for fifth disease. The virus will clear up on its own in a couple of weeks. If your child has joint pain or itchy rash, talk with your child's doctor about ways to ease symptoms. Acetaminophen (such as Tylenol) for children can help relieve joint pain.", "Causes": "Fifth disease is caused by human parvovirus B19. It often affects preschoolers or school-age children during the spring. The disease spreads through the fluids in the nose and mouth when someone coughs or sneezes.The disease causes a tell-tale bright-red rash on the checks. The rash also spreads to the body and can cause other symptoms.You can get fifth disease and not have any symptoms. About 20% of people who get the virus don't have symptoms."}, "Fanconi's anemia": {"description": "Fanconi's anemia is different from Fanconi syndrome, a rare kidney disorder.", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal heart, lungs, and digestive tract", "Bone problems (especially the hips, spine or ribs, can causes a curved spine (scoliosis)", "Changes in the color of the skin, such as darkened areas of the skin, called caf\u00e9 au lait spots, and vitiligo", "Deafness due to abnormal ears", "Eye or eyelid problems", "Kidney(s) that did not form correctly", "Problems with the arms and hands, such as missing, extra or misshapen thumbs, problems of the hands and the bone in the lower arm, and small or missing bone in the forearm\r\n \u00a0\u00a0\u00a0\r\n ", "Short height", "Small head", "Small testicles and genital changes", "Failure to thrive", "Learning disability", "Low birth weight", "Intellectual disability"], "Exams and Tests": "Common tests for Fanconi's anemia include:Bone marrow biopsy, Complete blood count (CBC), Developmental tests, Drugs added to a blood sample to check for damage to chromosomes, Hand x-ray and other imaging studies (CT scan, MRI), Hearing test, HLA tissue typing (to find matching bone-marrow donors), Ultrasound of the kidneys. Pregnant women may have amniocentesis or chorionic villous sampling to diagnose the condition in their unborn child.", "Causes": "Fanconi's anemia is due to an abnormal gene that damages cells, which keeps them from repairing damaged DNA.To inherit Fanconi's anemia, a person must get one copy of the abnormal gene from each parent.The condition is usually diagnosed in children between 2 and 15 years old.", "Prevention": "Families with this condition can have genetic counseling to better understand their risk.Vaccination can reduce certain complications, including pneumococcal pneumonia, hepatitis, and varicella infections.Persons with Fanconi's anemia should avoid cancer-causing substances (carcinogens) and have regular check-ups to screen for cancer.", "Treatment": "Patients with mild to moderate blood cell changes who do not need a transfusion may only need regular check-ups and blood count checks. The health care provider will closely monitor the person for other cancers, usually leukemia or cancers of the head, neck, or urinary system.Medicines called growth factors (such as erythropoietin, G-CSF, and GM-CSF) can improve blood counts for a short while.A bone marrow transplant can cure the blood count problems of Fanconi's anemia. (The best donor is a brother or sister whose tissue type matches the patient.)Persons who have had a successful bone marrow transplant still need regular check-ups because of the risk for additional cancers.Hormone therapy combined with low doses of steroids (such as hydrocortisone or prednisone) is prescribed to those who do not have a bone marrow donor. Most patients respond to hormone therapy. But everyone with the disorder will quickly get worse when the drugs are stopped. In most cases, these drugs eventually stop working.Additional treatments may include:Antibiotics (possibly given through a vein) to treat infections, Blood transfusions to treat symptoms due to low blood counts. Most people with this condition visit a blood disorder specialist (hematologist), a doctor who treats diseases related to glands (endocrinologist), and an eye doctor (ophthalmologist) regularly. They also may see a bone doctor (orthopedist), gynecologist, or kidney disease specialist (nephrologist)."}, "Foreign object - inhaled or swallowed": {"Symptoms": ["Choking", "Coughing", "No breathing or breathing trouble (respiratory distress)", "Wheezing"], "Causes": "Young children can easily breathe in certain foods (such as nuts, seeds, and popcorn) and small objects (such as buttons and beads). This may cause a partial or total airway blockage.If the object passes through the esophagus (food tube) and into the stomach without getting stuck, it will probably pass through the entire GI tract.", "description": "If you swallow a foreign object, it can get stuck along the gastrointestinal (GI) tract. This can lead to an infection or\u00a0blockage or tear in the GI tract", "Prevention": "Cut food into appropriate sizes for small children. Teach them how to chew well. , Discourage talking, laughing, or playing while food is in the mouth., Do not give potentially dangerous foods such as hot dogs, whole grapes, nuts, popcorn, or hard candy to children under age 3., Keep small objects out of the reach of young children.. "}, "Friedreich's ataxia": {"description": "Friedreich's ataxia is a rare disease passed down through families (inherited) that affects the muscles and heart.", "Possible Complications": "Diabetes, Heart failure or heart disease, Loss of ability to move around. ", "Symptoms": ["Abnormal speech", "Changes in vision, particularly color vision", "Decrease in ability to feel vibrations in lower limbs", "Foot problems, such as hammer toe and high arches", "Hearing loss -- occurs in about 10% of patients", "Jerky eye movements", "Loss of coordination and balance, which leads to frequent falls", "Muscle weakness", "No reflexes in the legs", "Unsteady gait and uncoordinated movements (ataxia) -- gets worse with time"], "Exams and Tests": "The following tests may be done:ECG, Electrophysiological studies, EMG (electromyography), Genetic testing , Nerve conduction tests, Muscle biopsy, X-ray, CT scan, or MRI of the head, X-ray of the chest, X-ray of the spine. Blood sugar (glucose) tests may reveal diabetes or glucose intolerance. An eye exam may show damage to the optic nerve, which usually occurs without symptoms.", "Treatment": "Treatment for Friedreich's ataxia includes:Counseling, Speech therapy, Physical therapy, Walking aids or wheelchairs. Orthopedic interventions (such as braces) may be needed for scoliosis and foot problems. Treatment of heart disease and diabetes may help improve the quality and duration of life.", "Causes": "Friedreich's ataxia is caused by a defect in a gene called Frataxin (FXN). This gene is located on chromosome 9. Changes in this gene cause the body to make too much of a part of DNA called trinucleotide repeat (GAA). Normally, the body contains about 8 to 30 copies of GAA. Those with\u00a0Friedreich's ataxia have as many as 1,000 copies. The more copies of GAA a patient has, the earlier in life the disease starts and the faster it gets worse.Friedreich's ataxia is an autosomal recessive genetic disorder. This means you must get a copy of the defective gene from both your mother and father.", "Prevention": "Individuals with a family history of Friedreich's ataxia who intend to have children should consider genetic screening and counseling to determine their risk."}, "Familial dysbetalipoproteinemia": {"description": "Familial dysbetalipoproteinemia is a disorder passed down through families. It causes high amounts of cholesterol and triglycerides in the blood.", "Possible Complications": "Heart attack, Stroke, Peripheral vascular disease, Intermittent claudication, Gangrene of the lower extremities. ", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain (angina) or other signs of coronary artery disease; may be present at a young age", "Cramping of one or both calves when walking ", "Sores on the toes that do not heal", "Sudden stroke-like symptoms such as trouble speaking, drooping on one side of the face, weakness of an arm or leg, and loss of balance"], "Exams and Tests": "Tests that may be done to diagnose this condition include:Genetic testing for apolipoprotein E (apoE), Lipid panel blood test, Triglyceride level, Very low density lipoprotein (VLDL) test. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to control conditions such as obesity, hypothyroidism, and diabetes.Making diet changes to reduce calories, saturated fats, and cholesterol may help lower blood cholesterol. If cholesterol and triglyceride levels are still high after you have made diet changes, your doctor may have you take medicines as well. Medicine to lower blood triglyceride and cholesterol levels include:Bile acid-sequestering resins, Fibrates (gemfibrozil, fenofibrate), Nicotinic acid, Statins . ", "Causes": "A genetic defect causes this condition. The defect results in the buildup of large lipoprotein particles that contain both cholesterol and a type of fat called triglycerides. The disease is linked to defects in the gene for apolipoprotein E in many cases.Hypothyroidism, obesity, or diabetes can make the condition worse. Risk factors for familial dysbetalipoproteinemia include a family history of the disorder or coronary artery disease.", "Prevention": "Screening the family members of people with this condition may lead to early detection and treatment.Getting treated early and limiting other risk factors such as smoking can help prevent early heart attacks, strokes, and blocked blood vessels."}, "Funnel-web spider bite": {"Symptoms": ["Drooling", "Drooping eyelids", "Double vision", "Swallowing difficulty", "Collapse", "High blood pressure", "Rapid heart rate", "Difficulty breathing", "Joint pain", "Severe muscle spasms -- usually in the legs and belly area", "Agitation", "Confusion", "Coma", "Headache", "Numbness of mouth and lips", "Tremors", "Shivering (chills)", "Redness around the site of bite", "Sweating -- excessive", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Vomiting"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222.", "Prevention": "Wear protective clothing whenever possible when traveling through terrain which is known to harbor these spiders. Do not stick your hands or feet in spider holes or under logs or underbrush."}, "Fluoride overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Abdominal pain", "Abnormal taste (salty or soapy taste)", "Convulsions", "Diarrhea", "Drooling", "Eye irritation if placed in eye", "Headache", "Heart attack", "Irregular heartbeat", "Nausea", "Shallow breathing", "Slow heartbeart", "Tremors", "Vomiting", "Weakness "], "description": "See also: Fluoride in diet"}, "Familial hypercholesterolemia": {"description": "Related topics include:", "Possible Complications": "Heart attack at an early age, Heart disease, Stroke, Peripheral vascular disease\u00a0. ", "Symptoms": ["Fatty skin deposits called xanthomas over parts of the hands, elbows, knees, ankles and around the cornea of the eye", "Cholesterol deposits in the eyelids (xanthelasmas)", "Chest pain (angina) or other signs of coronary artery disease; may be present at a young age", "Cramping of one or both calves when walking", "Sores on the toes that do not heal", "Sudden stroke-like symptoms such as trouble speaking, drooping on one side of the face, weakness of an arm or leg, and loss of balance "], "Exams and Tests": "A physical exam may show fatty skin growths called xanthomas and cholesterol deposits in the eye (corneal arcus).The doctor will ask questions about your personal and family medical history. There may be:A strong family history of familial hypercholesterolemia or early heart attacks, High levels of LDL cholesterol in either or both parents . People from families with a strong history of early heart attacks should have blood tests done to determine lipid levels.Blood tests may show:High levels of total cholesterol, High LDL levels , Normal triglyceride levels. Other tests that may be done include:Studies of cells called fibroblasts to see how the body absorbs LDL cholesterol, Genetic test for the defect associated with this condition. ", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to reduce the risk of atherosclerotic heart disease. People who get only one copy of the defective gene from their parents may do well with diet changes and statin drugs.LIFESTYLE CHANGESThe first step is to change what you eat. Most of the time,\u00a0the doctor will recommend that you try this for several months before prescribing medicines. Diet changes include lowering the amount of fat you eat so that it is less than 30% of your total calories. If you are overweight, losing weight is very helpful.Here are some ways to cut saturated fat out of your diet:Eat less beef, chicken, pork, and lamb, Replace full-fat dairy products\u00a0with low-fat products, Eliminate trans fats . You can lower the amount of cholesterol you eat by eliminating egg yolks and organ meats such as liver.It may help to talk to a dietitian who can give you advice about changing your eating habits. Weight loss and regular exercise may also help lower your cholesterol levels.MEDICATIONSIf lifestyle changes do not change your cholesterol levels or you have a very high risk of this condition, your doctor may recommend that you take medicines. There are several types of drugs available to help lower blood cholesterol levels and they work in different ways. Some are better at lowering LDL cholesterol, some are good at lowering triglycerides, while others help raise HDL cholesterol.Statin drugs are commonly used and are very effective. They include lovastatin (Mevacor), pravastatin (Pravachol), simvastatin (Zocor), fluvastatin (Lescol), atorvastatin (Lipitor), pitivastatin (Livalo),and rosuvastatin (Crestor). These drugs help lower your risk of heart attack and stroke. Other cholesterol-lowering medicines include:Bile acid-sequestering resins, Ezetimibe, Fibrates (such as gemfibrozil or fenofibrate), Nicotinic acid. People with a severe form of the disorder may need a treatment called apheresis. Blood or plasma is removed from the body. Special filters remove the extra LDL cholesterol, and the blood plasma is then returned to the body.", "Causes": "Familial hypercholesterolemia is a genetic disorder. It is caused by a defect on chromosome 19.The defect makes the body unable to remove low density lipoprotein (LDL, or \"bad\") cholesterol from the blood. This results in high levels of LDL in the blood. High levels of LDL cholesterol make you more likely to have narrowing of the arteries from atherosclerosis at an early age. The condition is typically passed down through families in an autosomal dominant manner. That means you only need to get the abnormal gene from one parent in order to inherit the disease.In rare cases, a child may inherit the gene from both parents. When this occurs, the increase in cholesterol levels is much more severe. The risk for heart attacks and heart disease are high even in childhood.", "Prevention": "A diet low in cholesterol and saturated fat and rich in unsaturated fat diet may help to control LDL levels.People with a family history of this condition, particularly if both parents carry the defective gene, may want to seek genetic counseling. "}, "Factor X deficiency": {"description": "Factor X (ten) deficiency is a disorder caused by too little of a protein called factor X in the blood. It leads to problems with normal blood clotting (coagulation).", "Possible Complications": "Severe bleeding or sudden loss of blood (hemorrhage) can occur. The joints may get deformed in severe disease from many bleeds.", "Symptoms": ["Bleeding into joints", "Muscle bleeding", "Mucus membrane bleeding", "Nosebleeds (epitaxis)"], "Exams and Tests": "Low factor X activity, Normal thrombin time, Prolonged partial thromboplastin time (PTT) \r\n , Prolonged prothrombin time (PT) \r\n . ", "Treatment": "You can control blood loss by getting infusions of fresh or frozen plasma or concentrates of clotting factors into the blood. If you lack vitamin K, you can take vitamin K by mouth, through injections under the skin, or through a vein (intravenously).Knowing that you have a bleeding disorder helps the doctor can take extra care if you need surgery. It also lets you alert also tell other family members who may have the same problem.", "Causes": "When you bleed, your body starts a series of reactions that help the blood clot. This is called the coagulation cascade. The process involves special proteins called coagulation factors. You can have a higher chance of excess bleeding when one or more of these clotting factors are missing.Factor X deficiency is often caused by a defect in the factor X gene that is passed through families. This is called inherited factor X deficiency. Bleeding ranges from mild to severe depending on the extent of deficiencyFactor X deficiency may also develop due to another condition or use of medications. This is called \u201cacquired factor X deficiency.\u201d Acquired factor X deficiency is common. It may be caused by:Lack of vitamin K (some newborns are born with vitamin K deficiency), systemic amyloidosis, severe liver disease, Use of medicines that prevent clotting (anticoagulants such as warfarin or Coumadin). Women with factor X deficiency may first be diagnosed when they have very heavy menstrual bleeding and bleeding after childbirth. The condition may be first noticed in newborn boys if they have bleeding that lasts longer than normal after circumcision.Inherited factor X deficiency affects 1 out of every 500,000 people.", "Prevention": "Inherited factor X deficiency is rare. There is no known prevention. "}, "Familial combined hyperlipidemia": {"description": "Familial combined hyperlipidemia is a disorder that is passed down through families. It causes high cholesterol and high blood triglycerides. ", "Possible Complications": "Early atherosclerotic heart disease, Heart attack\r\n  , Stroke. ", "Symptoms": ["Chest pain (angina) or other signs of coronary artery disease; may be present at a young age", "Cramping of one or both calves when walking", "Sores on the toes that do not heal", "Sudden stroke-like symptoms, such as trouble speaking, drooping on one side of the face, weakness of an arm or leg, and loss of balance "], "Exams and Tests": "Blood tests will be done to check your levels of cholesterol and triglycerides. Tests will show:Increased LDL\u00a0cholesterol, Decreased HDL cholesterol, Increased triglycerides, Increased apolipoprotein B100\u00a0 . Genetic testing is available for one type of familial combined hyperlipidemia.", "Treatment": "The goal of treatment is to reduce the risk of atherosclerotic heart disease.LIFESTYLE CHANGESThe first step is to change what you eat. Most of the time, you will try diet changes for several months before your doctor recommends medicines. Diet changes include lowering the amount of saturated fat and refined sugar. Here are some changes you can make: Eat less beef, chicken, pork, and lamb, Substitute low-fat dairy products for full-fat ones, Avoid packaged cookies and baked goods that contain trans fats, Reduce the cholesterol you eat by limiting egg yolks and organ meats . Counseling is often recommended to help people make changes to their eating habits. Weight loss and regular exercise may also help lower your cholesterol levels.MEDICATIONSIf lifestyle changes do not change your cholesterol levels, or you are at very high risk for atherosclerotic heart disease, your doctor may recommend that you take medicines. There are several types of drugs to help lower blood cholesterol levels. The drugs work in different ways to help you achieve healthy lipid levels. Some are better at lowering LDL cholesterol, some are good at lowering triglycerides, while others help raise HDL cholesterol.The most commonly used, and most effective drugs for treating high LDL cholesterol are called statins. They include lovastatin (Mevacor), pravastatin (Pravachol), simvastatin (Zocor), fluvastatin (Lescol), atorvastatin (Lipitor), rosuvastatin (Crestor), and pitivastatin (Livalo).Other cholesterol-lowering medicines include:Bile acid-sequestering resins, Ezetimibe, Fibrates (such as gemfibrozil and fenofibrate), Nicotinic acid. ", "Causes": "Familial combined hyperlipidemia is the most common genetic disorder that increases blood fats. It can cause early heart attacks. However, researchers have not yet found which specific genes cause it. Diabetes, alcoholism, and hypothyroidism make the condition worse. Risk factors include a family history of high cholesterol and early coronary artery disease.", "Prevention": "A diet that is low in cholesterol and saturated fat may help to control LDL levels in people at high risk.If someone in your family has this condition, you may want to consider genetic screening for yourself or your children. Sometimes younger children may have mild hyperlipidemia.It is important to control other risk factors for early heart attacks, such as smoking."}, "Fenoprofen calcium overdose": {"Symptoms": ["Breathing - slow and labored", "Blurred vision", "Ringing in the ears", "Little to no urine output", "Diarrhea", "Nausea", "Stomach pain", "Vomiting (sometimes with blood)", "Increased heart rate ", "Agitation", "Confusion", "Coma (decreased level of consciousness and lack of responsiveness)", "Convulsions", "Dizziness", "Drowsiness", "Incoherence (not understandable)", "Movement problems", "Numbness and tingling", "Unsteadiness", "Seizures", "Severe headache", "Rash"], "description": "This is for information only and not for use in the treatment or management of an actual poison exposure. If you have an exposure, you should call your local emergency number (such as 911) or the National Poison Control Center at 1-800-222-1222."}, "Facioscapulohumeral muscular dystrophy": {"description": "See also: Muscular dystrophy", "Possible Complications": "Decreased mobility, Decreased ability to care for self, Deformities of the face and shoulders, Hearing loss, Vision loss (rare). ", "Symptoms": ["Eyelid drooping", "Inability to whistle", "Decreased facial expression", "Depressed or angry facial expression", "Difficulty pronouncing words"], "Exams and Tests": "A physical examination\u00a0will show\u00a0weakness of the face and shoulder muscles. High blood pressure may be noted but is usually mild. An eye exam may show changes in the blood vessels in the back of the eye.Tests that may be done include:Creatine kinase test (may be slightly high), DNA testing, Electrocardiogram (EKG), EMG (electromyography), Fluorescein angiography, Genetic testing of chromosome 4, Hearing tests, Muscle biopsy (may confirm the diagnosis). ", "Treatment": "There is no known cure for facioscapulohumeral muscular dystrophy. Treatments are given to control symptoms and improve quality of life. Activity is encouraged. Inactivity such as bedrest can make the muscle disease worse.Physical therapy may help maintain muscle strength. Other possible treatments include:Oral albuterol to increase muscle mass (but not strength), Speech therapy, Surgery to fix a winged scapula, Walking aids and foot support devices . ", "Causes": "Facioscapulohumeral muscular dystrophy affects the upper body. It is not the same as\u00a0Duchenne muscular dystrophy and Becker muscular dystrophy, which\u00a0affect the lower body.Facioscapulohumeral muscular dystrophy is a genetic disorder. It appears in both men and women and may develop in a child if either parent carries the gene for the disorder. In 10\u00a0- 30% of cases, the parents do not\u00a0carry the genes.Facioscapulohumeral muscular dystrophy affects\u00a0about 5 out of 100,000 people. It affects men and women equally."}, "Fibroadenoma - breast": {"Symptoms": ["Easily moveable under the skin", "Firm", "Painless", "Rubbery"], "Exams and Tests": "After a physical exam, one or both of the following tests are usually done:Breast ultrasound, Mammogram. A biopsy may be done to get a definite diagnosis. Different types of biopsies include:Open surgical\u00a0\u00a0\u00a0 , Stereotactic, Ultrasound-guided. Women in their teens or early 20s may not need a biopsy if the lump goes away on its own or if the lump does not change over a long period.", "description": "Fibroadenoma of the breast is a benign tumor. Benign tumor means it is not caused by cancer.", "Causes": "Fibroadenoma is the most common benign tumor of the breast. Fibroadenoma is the most common breast tumor in women under age 30.A fibroadenoma is made up of breast gland tissue and tissue that helps support the breast gland tissue.African American\u00a0women tend to develop fibroadenomas more often and at an earlier age than\u00a0Caucasian women. The cause of fibroadenomas is not known.", "Treatment": "If a biopsy shows that the lump is a fibroadenoma, the lump may be left in place or removed.You and your surgeon can discuss whether or not to remove the lump. Reasons to have it removed include:Abnormal biopsy results, Pain or other symptoms, Worry or concern about cancer. If the lump is not removed, your health care provider will watch to see if it changes or grows. This may be done usingMammogram, Physical examination, Ultrasound. Sometimes, the lump\u00a0is destroyed without removing it, using freezing. This is called cryoablation."}, "Focal segmental glomerulosclerosis": {"description": "\"Focal\" means that some of the glomeruli become scarred. Others remain normal. \"Segmental\" means that only part of an individual glomerulus is damaged.", "Possible Complications": "Chronic kidney failure, End-stage kidney disease, Infection, Malnutrition, Nephrotic syndrome. ", "Symptoms": ["Foamy urine (from excess protein in the urine)", "Poor appetite", "Swelling, called generalized edema, from fluids held in the body", "Weight gain"], "Exams and Tests": "The health care provider will perform a physical exam. This exam may show issue swelling (edema) and high blood pressure. Signs of kidney (renal) failure and excess fluid may develop as the condition gets worse.Tests may include:Kidney biopsy, Kidney function tests (blood and urine), Urinalysis, Urine microscopy, Urine protein. ", "Treatment": "Treatments may include:Medicines to reduce the body's inflammatory response., Medicines to lower blood pressure. Some of these medicines also help reduce the amount of protein that spills into the urine., Medicines to get rid of excess fluid (diuretic or \"water pill\"), Low sodium diet\u00a0to reduce swelling and lower blood pressure . The goal of treatment is to control the symptoms of nephrotic syndrome and prevent chronic kidney failure.In general, treatments may include:Antibiotics to control infections, Anti-inflammatory medicines to reduce the immune response, Dialysis, Fluid restriction, Kidney transplant, Low-fat diet, Low- or moderate-protein diet (1 gram of protein per kilogram of body weight per day), Medicines to treat high blood pressure, high blood cholesterol, and high triglyceride levels, Salt-reduced diet, Vitamin D supplements. ", "Causes": "The cause of focal segmental glomerulosclerosis is often unknown.The condition affects both children and adults. It occurs slightly more often in men and boys. It is also more common in African Americans. Focal segmental glomerulosclerosis causes up to a quarter of all cases of nephrotic syndrome.Known causes include:Drugs such as heroin, bisphonsphonates, anabolic steroids, Infection, Inherited genetic problems, Obesity, Reflux nephropathy (a condition in which urine flows backward from the bladder to the kidney), Sickle cell disease, Some medicines . ", "Prevention": "No prevention is known."}}